FULLXIP/parSem/xip/archive/simple.4/english/FST/src/lex-places.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# CONTENT:	 Country and region names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:	 ENGLISH
!#
!# AUTHOR:	 A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	 16-Mar-2006
!# ============================================================================
!# USAGE:	 xfst  -e "read lexc [ThisFile]" -l rules.xfst
!# ============================================================================
!#
!# SOURCES: 
!# [0]: old analyser (cf. old-roots.txt)
!# [1]: file locations.xfst
!# [2]: file locationMod.xfst
!# [3]: file villes.xfst
!# [4]:	file adjectivesCountry.xfst
!# [5]: file cities.xfst	(not inculded in previuos analyser!)
!# 
!# more:
!# - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Historical_regions_of_Central_Europe
!# - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Historical_regions_of_the_Balkan_Peninsula
!# - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_adjectival_forms_of_place_names
!# - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Metropolitan_and_non-metropolitan_counties_of_England
!# - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Region_(EU)#Regions
!# - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rivers_of_the_World#River_lists
!# - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/South_Africa#Provinces
!# - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/States_and_territories_of_India
!# - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/U.S._state#State_lists

!# - http://europa.eu.int/comm/translation/currencies/entable1.htm	
!# - http://www.acronymfinder.com/stateabbreviations.asp
!# - http://www.shgresources.com/resources/symbols/names/residentnames/

!# - http://en.wikipedia.org
!# - http://www.websters-online-dictionary.org/
!# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Multichar_Symbols
+Prop		! proper name			(e.g. "America", "Denmark")
+Noun		! demonym noun 			(e.g. "Dane")	
+Adj		! demonym adjective		(e.g. "Danish")
+NAdj		! demonym noun or adjective	(e.g. "American")

+PostMod	! post-modifier [not used]
+PreMod		! pre-modifier	(e.g. "East")
+Head		! head word  	(e.g. "County")

+Continent	!
+Country	! country/nation of the world
+UsaState	! state of the USA
+State		! state/province of other country
+County		! county of GB
+Region		! other region (not further classified)
+City		!
+River
+Loc		! location (in general)

+Place		! unclassified place name (from original analyser)


+Abbr		! abbreviation
+Acron		! acronym

+Sg		! singular
+Pl		! plural
+SP		! singular and plural
+Gen		! genitive/possessive 's

! for internal use:
^MAN		! for irregular plura -man -> -men
^AND		! " and " or "&"
^DOT		! optional period at end of abbreviation
^PlE		! plural ending with -e-


! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! tag combinations:
! PLACE =  	[ +City | +Continent | +Country | +Conty | +Loc 
!		| +Region | +River | +State | +UsaState ] ;
! --------
! [+] NOTE: PLACE* indicates that several place tags may appear together:
!		e.g. 	"Washington+Prop+City+UsaState+Sg"
!			"Valencia+Prop+City+Region+Sg"
!			"Valencian+NAdj+City+Region+Sg"
! --------
!
!	+Prop PLACE* 		[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen) (+Acron|+Abbr)
!	+Prop PLACE +Head	[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen) (+Abbr)
!	+Prop PLACE +PreMod 			 (+Abbr)
!
!
! demonyms :
!	+Adj  PLACE* 
! 	+NAdj PLACE* 		[+Sg|+SP]
!	+Noun PLACE*		[+Sg|+Pl|+SP] (+Gen)
!
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------


!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON ROOT
	WORDPARTS ;
	PLACENAMES ;


LEXICON GENSG		< %^GenSg >		#;
LEXICON GENPL		< %^GenPl >		#;

LEXICON optGENSG	#; GENSG;
LEXICON optGENPL	#; GENPL;

LEXICON N/SG		< %+Sg:0 >		optGENSG;
LEXICON N/PL		< %+Pl:0 >		optGENPL;
LEXICON N/SG+PLs				N/SG; 
			< 0:{+s} >		N/PL;

LEXICON PROP/SG		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG;
LEXICON PROP/PL		< %+Prop:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON PROP		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!#  name modifiers
LEXICON PREMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PreMod:0 >		#;
!LEXICON POSTMOD		< %+Prop:0 %+PostMod:0 >	#;

LEXICON HEAD/SG		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG;
LEXICON HEAD/PL		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON HEAD		< %+Prop:0 %+Head:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

!# --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# demonyms

LEXICON NOUN		< %+Noun:0 >			N/SG+PLs;
LEXICON NOUNINV		< %+Noun:0 %+SP:0 >		optGENSG;

LEXICON ADJ		< %+Adj:0 >			#;

! noun or adjective
LEXICON NADJ		< %+NAdj:0 %+Sg:0 >		#;
			< %+Noun:0 %+Sg:0 >		GENSG;
			< %+Noun:0 %+Pl:{+s} >		optGENPL;
LEXICON NADJINV		< %+NAdj:0 %+SP:0 >		#;
			< %+Noun:0 %+SP:0 >		GENSG;

! possible replacement:
! LEXICON NADJ		ADJ; NOUN;
! LEXICON NADJINV	ADJ; NOUNINV;

LEXICON WORDPARTS
Great+Loc			PREMOD;
North+Loc			PREMOD;
North-Eastern+Loc		PREMOD;
north-western+Loc		ADJ;
North-Western+Loc		PREMOD;
Northeastern+Loc		PREMOD;
northern+Loc			ADJ;
Northwest+Loc			PREMOD;
South+Loc			PREMOD;
south-eastern+Loc		ADJ;
South-Eastern+Loc		PREMOD;
South-Western+Loc		PREMOD;
southeastern+Loc		ADJ;
Southeastern+Loc		PREMOD;
Southwest+Loc			PREMOD;
southwestern+Loc		ADJ;
West+Loc			PREMOD;
Central+Loc			PREMOD;
New+Loc				PREMOD;
Upper+Loc			PREMOD;
La+Loc				PREMOD;
Pont+Loc			PREMOD;
Sao+Loc				PREMOD;
Sante+Loc			PREMOD;
Apartment+Loc+Abbr:Apt^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Area+Region			HEAD;		! [2]
Avenue+Loc+Abbr:Av^DOT		HEAD/SG;
Avenue+Loc+Abbr:Ave^DOT		HEAD/SG;
Beach+Loc			HEAD;		! [2]
Boulevard+Loc+Abbr:Bd^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Boulevard+Loc+Abbr:Bld^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Building+Loc+Abbr:Bldg^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Butte+Loc			HEAD;		! [2]
Camp+Loc			PREMOD;		! [2]
Cemetery+Loc			HEAD;		! [2]
Chateau+Loc			HEAD/SG;	! [2]
Chateau+Loc:Chateaux		HEAD/PL;	! [2]
Circle+Loc			HEAD;
Circle+Loc+Abbr:Cir^DOT		HEAD/SG;
County+Region			HEAD;		! [2]
Desert+Region			HEAD;		! [2]
Drive+Loc+Abbr:Dr^DOT		HEAD/SG;
Expressway+Loc+Abbr:Expwy^DOT	HEAD/SG;
Falls+Loc			HEAD;		! [2]
Farm+Loc			HEAD;
Fort+Loc+Abbr:Ft^DOT		PREMOD;
Freeway+Loc			HEAD;
Grange+Loc			HEAD;		! [2]
Harbour+Loc			HEAD;
Heights+Loc			HEAD/PL;
Kingdom+Country			HEAD;
Loch+Region			HEAD;
Memorial+Loc			HEAD;		! [2]
Mount+Loc			PREMOD;
Mountain+Region+Abbr:Mtn^DOT	HEAD/SG;
National% Park+Loc		HEAD;		! [2]
Peninsula+Region		HEAD;		! [2]
Place+Loc+Abbr:Pl^DOT		HEAD/SG;
Point+Loc+Abbr:Pt^DOT		HEAD/SG;
Principality+Country		HEAD;
Region+Region			HEAD;		! [2]
Road+Loc+Abbr:Rd^DOT		HEAD/SG;
Roadway+Loc			HEAD;
Room+Loc+Abbr:Rm^DOT		HEAD/SG;
Sound+Loc			HEAD;		! [2]
Street+Loc+Abbr:St^DOT		HEAD/SG;
Suite+Loc+Abbr:Ste^DOT		HEAD/SG;
Theater+Loc			HEAD;		! [2]
Wood+Loc			HEAD;		! [2]
LEXICON PLACENAMES
Aetolian+Region					NADJ;		!# GR
Alpine+Region					ADJ;		!# FR
Anagé+City				PROP/SG;	!	[5]
Andaman% Island+State				PROP;		!# IN
Anguillan+Country				NADJ;		!# AI
antarctic+Continent				ADJ;		!#	[0]
Antipodes+Region				PROP/PL;	!#	fig.
Armorican+Region				NADJ;		!# FR	[4]
Ashmore% and% Cartier% Islands+State		PROP/PL;	!# AU	[1]
Ashmore% Island+State				PROP;		!# AU
Aurilândia+City				PROP/SG;	!	[5]
Azerbaijani+Country				ADJ;		!# AZ	[4]
Azeri+Country					NOUNINV;	!# AZ
Baltic+Region					NADJ;		!	[0]
Bangladeshi+Country				NOUNINV;	!# BD	[4]
Bellerose+Place					PROP/SG;	!# ??
Beninese+Country				NADJINV;	!# BJ	[4]
Bermudan+Country				NADJ;		!# BM	[4]
Bhutanese+Country				NADJINV;	!# BT
Boukan+City					PROP/SG;	!	[5]
Brabantine+Region				ADJ;		!# NL
British% Virgin% Islands+Country		PROP/PL;	!# VG
Briton+Country					NOUN;		!# GB
Budapesti+City					NOUNINV;	!#	<Budapest
Bulgarian+Country				NADJ;		!# BG
Burmese+Country					NADJINV;	!# MM
Bygdaili+City					PROP/SG;	!	[5]
Caribbean+Region				NADJ;		!	[0]
Cartier% Island+State				PROP;		!# AU
Cayenne+City					PROP/SG;	!# GF
Cayman% Islands+Country				PROP/PL;	!# KY
Chinese+Country					NADJINV;	!# CN
Christmas% Islander+Country			NOUN;		!# CX
Coatesville+City				PROP/SG;	!#	[3]
Colombian+Country				NADJ;		!# CO
Cook% Islander+Country				NOUN;		!# CK
Coral% Sea% Islands+State			PROP/PL;	!# AU
Corkonian+City					ADJ;		!#	<Cork
Cornish+Region					NADJINV;	!#	[4]
Cúcuta+City				PROP/SG;	!	[5]
Dacian+Region					NADJ;		!# RO, CS, HU
Dane+Country					NOUN;		!# DK
Danish+Country					ADJ;		!# DK
Dutchman^MAN+Country				NOUN;		!# NL
East% Timorese+Country				NADJINV;	!# TL
Ecuadorian+Country				NADJ;		!# EC	[4]
Englishman^MAN+Region				NOUN;		!# GB
Eng.+Region+Abbr				PROP/SG;	!# GB	=England
Equatorial% Guinean+Country			NOUN;		!# GQ
Faeroe% Islands+Country				PROP/PL;	!# FO
Faeroese+Country				NADJINV;	!# FO	[4]
Faroes+Country					PROP/PL;	!# FO
Filipino+Country				NOUN;		!# PH
Finnish+Country					ADJ;		!# FI
Fleming+Region					NOUN;		!# BE
Fort% Lauderdalian+City				NADJ;		!#	<Fort Lauderdale
Frankish+Region					NADJINV;	!#	[4]
Frenchwoman^MAN+Country				NOUN;		!# FR
Friesic+Region					ADJ;		!# NL
Futuna% Island+Country				PROP;		!# WF	=Wallis and Futuna
Genevese+City					NADJINV;	!#	<Geneva
Glenlyn+Place					PROP/SG;	!# ??
Great% Lakes+Region				PROP/PL;	!#	[1]
Greenlander+Country				NOUN;		!# GL
Greenlandic+Country				ADJ;		!# GL	[4]
Guadeloupean+Country				NADJ;		!# GP
Guianese+Country				NADJINV;	!# GF
Heard% Island+Country				PROP;		!# HM
Himalaya+Region					PROP;		
Hode+Place					PROP/SG;	!# ??
Hong% Kong% Chinese+Country			NADJINV;	!# HK
Ionian% Islands+Region				PROP/PL;	!# GR
Iowan+UsaState					NADJ;		!# US	<Iowa
Irish+Country					ADJ;		!# IE
Irishman^MAN+Country				NOUN;		!# IE
Jan% Mayen% Island+Region			PROP;		!# SJ
Japanese+Country				NADJINV;	!# JP
Johnsonburg+Place				PROP/SG;	!# ??
Keeling% Islander+Country			NOUN;		!# CC
Kirghiz+Country					NADJINV;	!# KG	[4]
Kurdish+Region					ADJ;		
Kurd+Region					NOUN;		
Lamoni+Place					PROP/SG;	!# ??
Lebanese+Country				NADJINV;	!# LB
Lombardic+Region				ADJ;		!# IT
Londoner+City					NADJ;		!#	<London
Luxembourger+Country				NOUN;		!# LU
Macanese+Country				NADJINV;	!# MO
Madeira% Island+Region				PROP;		!# PT
Mahorais+Country				NOUNINV;	!# YT
Mahoran+Country					ADJ;		!# YT
Malinta+Place					PROP/SG;	!# ??
Malvinas+Country				PROP/PL;	!# FK
Marseillais+City				NADJINV;	!#	<Marseille
Masurian+Region					NADJ;		!# PL
McDonald% Island+Country			PROP;		!# HM
Midi-Pyrenees+Region				PROP/PL;	!# FR
Miquelonnais+Country				NOUNINV;	!# PM
Mohammedia+City					PROP/SG;	!	[5]
Mongol+Country					NOUN;		!# MN
Namibian+Country				NADJ;		!# NA	[4]
Navarrese+Region				NADJINV;	!# ES
Nicobar% Island+State				PROP;		!# IN
Norfolk% Islander+Country			NOUN;		!# NF
Northern% Mariana% Islands+Country		PROP/PL;	!# MP
Ogdensburg+Place				PROP/SG;	!# ??
Ohioan+UsaState					NADJ;		!# US	<Ohio
Palmerstonian+City				ADJ;		!#	<Palmerston
Papua% New% Guinean+Country			NOUN;		!# PG
Piggott+Place					PROP/SG;	!# ??
Pitcairn% Island+Country			PROP;		!# PN
Polesian+Region					NADJ;		!# BY, PL, UA
Pyrenees+Region					PROP/PL;	!# FR
Reunionese+Country				NADJINV;	!# RE
Ribe+City					PROP/SG;	!	[5]
Saint% Helenian+Country				NADJ;		!# SH
Saint-Pierrais+Country				NOUNINV;	!# PM
Saint% Vincent% and% the% Grenadines+Country	PROP/PL;	!# VC
Scotch+Region					ADJ;		!# GB
Senegalese+Country				NADJINV;	!# SN
Seychellois+Country				NOUNINV;	!# SC	[4]
Shellsburg+Place				PROP/SG;	!# ??
Slovenian+Country				ADJ;		!# SI	[4]
Solomon% Islander+Country			NOUN;		!# SB
Solomons+Country				PROP/PL;	!# SB
South% American+Continent			NADJ;		
Surinamese+Country				NADJINV;	!# SR	[4]
Svalbard% Island+Country			PROP;		!# SJ
Swedish+Country					ADJ;		!# SE
Tamdy+City					PROP/SG;	!	[5]
Territory% of% Cocos% Islands+Country		PROP/PL;	!# CC
Territory% of% New% Caledonia% and% Dependencies+Country	PROP/PL;	!# NC
Togolese+Country				NADJINV;	!# TG	[4]
Tokelauan+Country				NADJ;		!# TK
Trinidadian+Country				NOUN;		!# TT	[4]
Turks% and% Caicos% Islands+Country		PROP/PL;	!# TC
Turks% Island+Country				PROP;		!# TC
United% States+Country				PROP/PL;	!# US
USA+Country+Acron				PROP/PL;	!# US	=United States of America
US% Virgin% Islands+Country			PROP/PL;	!# VI
Vadito+Place					PROP/SG;	!# ??
Varsovian+City					NADJ;		!#	<Warsaw
Virgin% Islander+Country			NOUN;		!# VI
Virgin% Islands% of% the% United% States+Country	PROP/PL;	!# VI
Wallis% Island+Country				PROP;		!# WF	= Wallis and Futuna
Welshman^MAN+Region				NOUN;		!# GB
Worton+Place					PROP/SG;	!# ??
